Arkansas, session 2025, HB1774.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-123-303 is amended to read as follows:
16-123-303. Creation — Members.
(a) There is created the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission, which shall
consist of seven (7) members.
(b) The seven (7) members of the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission
shall be selected as follows:
(1) Five (5) members with knowledge or experience in the fields
of real estate, homebuilding, mortgage lending, banking, or other related
fields, appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate;
(2) One (1) member who has demonstrated active involvement or
interest in fair housing issues, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate; and
(3) One (1) member who has demonstrated active involvement or
interest in fair housing issues, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
(b)(1) The Arkansas Fair Housing Commission shall consist of thirteen
(13) voting members, to be selected as follows: Seven (7) appointed by the
Governor subject to confirmation by the Senate, three (3) appointed by the
*JMB146*
03/12/2025 5:31:02 PM JMB146

HB1774
Speaker of the House of Representatives, and three (3) appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, as set forth in this subchapter, for
terms of four (4) years whose terms begin on January 1 and end on December 31
of the fourth year or when their respective successors are appointed and
qualified.
(2)(A)(i) One (1) member shall have been a licensed real estate
broker or licensed real estate salesperson engaged in the practice of
residential real estate sales for not fewer than five (5) years prior to his
or her appointment.
(ii) One (1) member shall have been a licensed real
estate broker or licensed real estate salesperson engaged in the practice of
multifamily real estate property management for no fewer than five (5) years
prior to his or her appointment.
(iii) One (1) member shall have been a licensed real
estate broker or licensed real estate salesperson engaged in the practice of
real estate for no fewer than five (5) years prior to his or her appointment.
(B) The Governor shall appoint members to fill vacancies
under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section after consulting the Arkansas
Realtors Association, subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(3)(A) One (1) member shall have been a licensed homebuilder
engaged in the homebuilding business for not fewer than five (5) years.
(B) The Governor shall appoint a member to fill a vacancy
for the member to represent subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section after
consulting the Arkansas Home Builders Association and subject to confirmation
by the Senate.
(4)(A) One (1) member shall have been a mortgage broker employed
for not fewer than five (5) years by a registered mortgage loan company or
loan broker.
(B) The Governor shall appoint a member to fill a vacancy
for the member to represent subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section after
consulting the Mortgage Bankers Association of Arkansas and subject to
confirmation by the Senate.
(5)(A) One (1) member shall have been a banker engaged in the
banking business for not fewer than five (5) years.
(B) The Governor shall appoint a member to fill a vacancy
for the member to represent subdivision (b)(5)(A) of this section after
03/12/2025 5:31:02 PM JMB146

HB1774
consulting Arkansas Community Bankers and the Arkansas Bankers Association
and subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(6)(A)(i) Seven (7) members shall represent consumers and shall
not be actively engaged in or retired from the business of real estate,
homebuilding, mortgage lending, or banking, including one (1) member who
shall be appointed by the Governor to represent persons meeting the
definition of individuals with a disability in this subchapter after
consulting the Governor's Commission on People with Disabilities and subject
to confirmation by the Senate.
(ii) Three (3) of the members to be appointed
pursuant to subdivision (b)(6)(A)(i) of this section shall be appointed by
the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one (1) member who shall be a
fair housing attorney or advocate with at least five (5) years of experience
in advocacy for fair housing issues.
(iii) Three (3) of the members to be appointed
pursuant to subdivision (b)(6)(A)(i) of this section shall be appointed by
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, one (1) member of whom shall be
sixty (60) years of age or older who shall represent the elderly.
(B) A minimum of four (4) appointments made pursuant to
subdivision (b)(6)(A)(i) of this section shall be given to persons protected
under §§ 16-123-310 — 16-123-316.
(c) Members of the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission shall serve a term
of four (4) years, or until a successor has been appointed and qualified.
(d) A vacancy arising in the membership of the Arkansas Fair Housing
Commission shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term by the
appointing authority in the same manner as provided for initial appointments.
(e) The appointing authorities shall make an effort to ensure that the
membership of the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission is reflective of the
geographic diversity of the state.
(c)(f) All members shall be full voting members of the Arkansas Fair
Housing Commission.
(d)(1) Members of the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission appointed by
the Governor shall at all times include one (1) member from each Arkansas
congressional district.
(2) Appointments by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and
the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be as follows:
03/12/2025 5:31:02 PM JMB146

HB1774
(A) The three (3) members appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate shall be from the First Congressional District and the
Second Congressional District and the three (3) members appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be from the Third Congressional
District and the Fourth Congressional District;
(B) At the next time for appointments, the three (3)
members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall be from
the Third Congressional District and the Fourth Congressional District and
the three (3) members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives shall be from the First Congressional District and the Second
Congressional District; and
(C) Future appointments shall alternate between the
requirements of subdivisions (d)(2)(A) and (B) of this section.
(e)(g) The Arkansas Fair Housing Commission shall elect a chair from
its membership.
(f)(h) The Arkansas Fair Housing Commission shall meet at least
quarterly.
(g)(1) The members of the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission shall serve
four-year terms, except that the initial appointees shall serve staggered
terms determined by a procedure established by the Arkansas Fair Housing
Commission so that six (6) serve a two-year term and seven (7) serve a four-
year term.
(2) No member may serve more than two (2) four-year terms.
(h)(i) Each commissioner may receive expense reimbursement and
stipends in accordance with § 25-16-905.

SECTION 2. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Changes in membership.
(a)(1) Upon the effective date of this act, the existing members of
the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission shall continue to serve and shall
exercise the powers and duties assigned to the Arkansas Fair Housing
Commission until the expiration of the members' terms.
(2) This act shall not shorten the term of any current member of
the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission.
(b) The new membership requirements shall be implemented as the terms
expire and by filing vacancies in the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission.
(c) If the terms of all existing members of the Arkansas Fair Housing
03/12/2025 5:31:02 PM JMB146

HB1774
Commission have expired on or before the effective date of this act, the
appointing authorities shall appoint new members of the Arkansas Fair Housing
Commission in compliance with this act.

































03/12/2025 5:31:02 PM JMB146